Wyoming, session 2026, HB0018.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-2-414(a) by creating a new
paragraph (iv) and by creating a new subsection (d) is
amended to read:

HB0018

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0120
9-2-414. Department of state parks and cultural
resources; powers and duties relative to museums,
historical sites and parks.

(a) The director may:

(iv) By rule, establish and collect fees for:

(A) Nonresident admission to the Wyoming
state museum;

(B) Participation in museum-related events;

(C) Other museum services.

(d) Fees collected under paragraph (a)(iv) of this
section shall be deposited to the museum enterprise fund,
previously known as the department of commerce enterprise
fund, which is hereby codified and continued. Funds in the
museum enterprise fund shall be expended only upon
legislative appropriation.

HB0018

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0120
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0018